Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2473
Practitioner, defined.

Practitioner means a certified registered nurse anesthetist, a certified nurse midwife, a dentist, an optometrist, a nurse practitioner, a pharmacist, a physician assistant, a physician, or a podiatrist credentialed under the Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 17.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.